Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
ARTICLE 2.7
INTERNET EVIDENCE FOR
LAW ENFORCEMENT INVESTIGATIONS

Section

6-2.7-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Court order" means an order for the release of information, including but not limited to a subpoena, court order, search warrant, or summons.

"Internet access provider" means an entity that provides electronic communications as defined in 18 U.S.C. sec. 2510 or remote computing services as defined in 18 U.S.C. sec. 2711 to customers in Colorado. "Internet access provider" shall not include noninternet-based communications.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added, p. 2057, § 9, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2965, § 13, effective August 10.

6-2.7-102. Internet evidence for law enforcement - preserve and release evidence - reports - training materials.

An internet access provider, upon the request of a law enforcement agency, shall take all necessary steps to preserve records and other evidence in its possession pending the issuance of a court order or other legal process. The internet access provider shall comply with the request as soon as possible following receipt.

Records referred to in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall be retained for a period of ninety days, which shall be extended for an additional ninety-day period upon a renewed request by the law enforcement agency.

An internet access provider shall release evidence regarding all categories of information identified in 18 U.S.C. sec. 2703 (c)(2) that are in its possession within ten days after receiving a court order requiring the internet access provider to release such evidence to law enforcement. If the internet access provider demonstrates to the requesting law enforcement agency within five days of the request that, for bona fide technical reasons, it cannot comply with the order within ten days of the request, it shall make every reasonable effort to comply with the request as soon as reasonably possible.

In connection with any criminal investigation regarding possible sex offenses involving a child under section 18-1.3-1003, C.R.S., that involves immediate danger of death or serious bodily harm, a law enforcement agency in this state may issue a request, without compulsory legal process or court order, to a designated recipient of the internet access provider to disclose, consistent with 18 U.S.C. sec. 2702 (c)(4), the information identified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2). The internet access provider shall comply with the request immediately and without delay, or if unable to immediately comply, communicate with the requesting agency to discuss the nature of the request and to coordinate a timely response.

An internet access provider doing business in this state shall report incidents of apparent child pornography to the national center for missing and exploited children pursuant to 18 U.S.C. sec. 2258A. The report shall include, if available, the subscriber's city and state or zip code.

Each internet access provider with more than fifteen thousand subscribers who are residents of this state shall, upon request of the attorney general, provide training materials to law enforcement agencies in this state regarding best practices for investigating internet-related crimes involving sexual exploitation of children, the internet access provider's law enforcement compliance practices, and contact information for the internet access provider and its designated recipient for law enforcement requests.

Subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be interpreted consistent with the requirements of federal law that apply to internet access providers, including but not limited to 18 U.S.C. 2701 et seq. and 18 U.S.C. sec. 2258A.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added, p. 2058, § 9, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

(3) and (5) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2966, § 14, effective August 10.

6-2.7-103. Internet evidence - failure to release or preserve - civil penalty.

An internet access provider that fails to comply with the requirements in section 6-2.7-102 (1) or (2) shall be liable for payment of a civil penalty of up to two thousand five hundred dollars for each incidence of noncompliance; except that the internet access provider shall be liable for payment of up to ten thousand dollars for a third and subsequent incidence of noncompliance that occurs within a twelve-month period. The state attorney general is authorized to bring suit in a court of competent jurisdiction for enforcement of the provisions of this subsection (1).

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1) of this section, an internet access provider's failure to comply with the requirements specified in section 6-2.7-102 shall not result in further civil liability to the state.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added, p. 2059, § 9, effective October 1.